District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.76

Repealed

Dissolution of corporation — By voluntary act of incorporators; procedure for filing of articles of dissolution.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 212, ch. 269, § 76
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 85-254, § 19
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.76.
1981 Ed., § 29-376.
1973 Ed., § 29-930.